Massachusetts, session 194th, H3251.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62 of the General Laws of Massachusetts is hereby amended by inserting the
following subsection after Section 3(B)(a)(20):
"(21) Such net amount of the Part B adjusted gross income received as tips by an
employee, as defined in Chapter 149, Section 152A."
of 1